Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 75 Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973
12-75-107. Declaration of disaster emergencies.

(1)A disaster emergency shall be declared by executive order or proclamation of the Governor if he or she finds a disaster has occurred or that the occurrence or the threat of disaster is imminent.

When time is critical because of rapidly occurring disaster emergency events, the Governor may verbally declare for immediate response and recovery purposes until the formalities of a written executive order or proclamation can be completed in the prescribed manner.

(1)The state of disaster emergency shall continue until:

The Governor finds that the threat or danger has passed and terminates the state of disaster emergency by executive order or proclamation; or

The disaster has been dealt with to the extent that emergency conditions no longer exist and the employees engaged in the restoration of utility services have returned to the point of origin.

No state of disaster emergency may continue for longer than sixty (60) days unless renewed by the Governor.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1941; Acts 1999, No. 646, §§ 13, 14; 1999, No. 913, § 2; 2001, No. 1278, § 1; 2007, No. 197, § 4.

12-75-108. Local disaster emergencies — Declaration.

(1)A local disaster emergency may be declared only by the chief executive or his or her designee of a political subdivision.

If time is critical because of a rapidly occurring disaster emergency event, the chief executive verbally may declare a local disaster emergency for immediate response and recovery purposes until the formalities of a written declaration can be completed in the prescribed manner.

A declaration of a local disaster emergency shall not be continued or renewed for a period in excess of one hundred twenty (120) days except by or with the consent of the governing body of the political subdivision.

Any order or proclamation declaring, continuing, or terminating a local disaster emergency shall be given prompt and general publicity and shall be filed promptly with the city or county clerk, as applicable.

(1)The effect of a declaration of a local disaster emergency is to activate the response and recovery aspects of any and all applicable local or interjurisdictional disaster emergency plans, to authorize the furnishing of aid and assistance thereunder, and to initiate emergency management functions under this chapter.

(A)In addition to other powers conferred on the chief executive declaring a local disaster emergency, the chief executive may suspend the provisions of any local regulatory ordinances or regulations for up to thirty (30) days if strict compliance with the ordinance provisions would prevent, hinder, or delay necessary actions to cope with the disaster emergency.

Local regulatory ordinances include, but are not limited to:

Zoning ordinances;

Subdivision regulations;

Regulations controlling the development of land;

Building codes;

Fire prevention codes;

Sanitation codes;

Sewer ordinances;

Historic district ordinances; and

Any other regulatory type ordinances.

(1)An interjurisdictional office of emergency management or official of an interjurisdictional office of emergency management shall not declare a local disaster emergency unless expressly authorized by the interjurisdictional agreement under which the interjurisdictional office of emergency management functions.

However, an interjurisdictional office of emergency management shall provide aid and services in accordance with the interjurisdictional agreement under which it functions.

If a county judge uses county labor and equipment on private property to provide services that are required as a result of the natural disaster, the county judge shall notify the owner of the private property by any possible method as soon as practicable of:

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1946; Acts 2001, No. 568, § 1; No. 1278, § 2; 2007, No. 197, § 5; 2007, No. 465, § 2; 2009, No. 165, §§ 29, 30; 2013, No. 169, § 1; 2013, No. 973, § 1.

12-75-109. Division of Emergency Management — Establishment — Personnel.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Public Safety.

All such employees shall be in job positions as approved by the secretary and the Office of Personnel Management.

The director shall establish training and professional standards required to supplement state personnel based on state and federal disaster recovery program needs and shall establish a list of persons with those qualifications and make available to emergency reserve cadre personnel such additional training and education opportunities as may be needed to maintain currency and proficiency in the needed skills.

(A)Emergency reserve cadre personnel shall be reimbursed at the current state classified entry level salary rate for the position they are temporarily employed to fill and meet such additional training, experience, and qualifications as established by the director for the grade level of the position for which they are employed.

(A)Emergency reserve cadre personnel may be called to active duty upon declaration of a disaster emergency as stipulated in this chapter or the Disaster Relief Act of 1974, Pub. L. No. 93-288, or both, or by executive order of the Governor upon recommendation by the director for due cause or pending emergency needs or for disaster-related assistance to the division as determined by the director and shall remain on active duty no longer than the maximum allowed by the office for part-time employment status.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 5; 1977, No. 408, § 1; 1985, No. 687, § 4; 1985, No. 978, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1938; Acts 1999, No. 646, § 15; 2001, No. 1278, § 3; 2007, No. 197, § 6; 2009, No. 165, § 31; 2013, No. 169, § 2;
2019, No. 910, § 5875.

12-75-110. Division of Emergency Management — State emergency operations plan.

The Division of Emergency Management shall coordinate and maintain a state emergency operations plan and keep it current, which plan may include:

Prevention and minimization of injury and damage caused by disaster;

Measures for prompt and effective response to disasters;

Emergency relief;

Identification of areas particularly vulnerable to disasters;

Recommendations for zoning, building, and other land use controls, safety measures for securing mobile homes or other nonpermanent or semipermanent structures, and other preventive and preparedness measures designed to eliminate or reduce disasters or their impact;

(1)In preparing and revising the state emergency operations plan, the division shall seek the advice and assistance of state agencies, local government, business, labor, industry, agriculture, civic, and volunteer organizations, and community leaders.

In advising local and jurisdictional agencies, the division shall encourage them also to seek advice from the entities listed in subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The state emergency operations plan or any part of the state emergency operations plan may be incorporated in rules of the division or executive orders that have the force and effect of law.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 5; 1977, No. 408, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1938; Acts 1999, No. 449, § 6; 1999, No. 646, § 16; 2007, No. 197, § 7; 2009, No. 165, §§ 32, 33; 2019, No. 910, §§
5876, 5877.

12-75-111. Division of Emergency Management — Other powers and duties.

The Division of Emergency Management shall, with the assistance and cooperation of other state and local government agencies:

Determine requirements of the state and its political subdivisions for food, clothing, and other necessities in event of an emergency;

Procure and pre-position supplies, medicines, materials, and equipment;

Promulgate standards and requirements for local and interjurisdictional emergency operations plans;

Periodically review local and interjurisdictional emergency operations plans;

Provide for mobile support units;

Establish and operate or assist political subdivisions, their local offices of emergency management, and interjurisdictional offices of emergency management to establish and operate training programs and programs of public information;

Make surveys of industries, resources, and facilities within the state, both public and private, as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Plan and make arrangements for the availability and use of any private facilities, services, and property and, if necessary and if in fact used, provide for payment for use under terms and conditions agreed upon;

Establish a register of persons with types of training and skills important in emergency prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery;

Establish a register of mobile and construction equipment and temporary housing available for use in a disaster emergency;

Prepare for issuance by the Governor of executive orders, proclamations, and rules as necessary or appropriate in coping with disasters;

Cooperate with the federal government and any public or private agency or entity in achieving the purpose of this chapter and in implementing programs for disaster prevention, preparation, response, and recovery; and

Do other things necessary, incidental, or appropriate for the implementation of this chapter.

(1)The division shall take an integral part in the development and revision of local and interjurisdictional emergency operations plans prepared under §12-75-118.

(A)To meet the requirements of subdivision (b)(1) of this section, the division shall employ or otherwise secure the services of professional and technical personnel capable of providing expert assistance to political subdivisions, their local offices of emergency management, interjurisdictional planning, and interjurisdictional offices of emergency management.

The division shall perform all functions necessary to maintain and operate the Arkansas Wireless Information Network, including without limitation:

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 5; 1977, No. 408, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1938; Acts 1999, No. 646, § 17; 2007, No. 197, § 8; 2009, No. 165, §§ 34, 35; 2019, No. 315, §
966; 2019, No. 702, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§
5878, 5879.

12-75-112. Communications networks.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 5; 1977, No. 408, § 1; 1985, No. 687, § 4; 1985, No. 978, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1938; Acts 1999, No. 646, § 18; 2007, No. 197, § 9; 2009, No. 165, § 36; 2019, No. 910, § 5880.

12-75-113. Emergency response vehicles.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 8; 1985, No. 687, § 6; 1985, No. 978, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1941; Acts 1999, No. 646, § 19; 2009, No. 165, § 37; 2019, No. 910, §
5881.

12-75-114. Governor — Disaster emergency responsibilities.

Executive orders, proclamations, and regulations have the force and effect of law.

The initial amount of the disaster response fund shall be in the amount of two million dollars ($2,000,000), solely for use to defray the cost of immediate emergency response.

The disaster recovery fund shall be in the amount of five million dollars ($5,000,000), with:

To the greatest extent practicable, the Governor shall delegate or assign operational control by prior arrangement embodied in appropriate executive orders or rules, but nothing in this section restricts the Governor's authority to do so by orders issued at the time of the disaster emergency.

Suspend the provisions of any regulatory statutes prescribing the procedures for conduct of state business, or the orders or rules of any state agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of any statute, order, or rule would in any way prevent, hinder, or delay necessary action in coping with the emergency;

Utilize all available resources of the state government and of each political subdivision of the state as reasonably necessary to cope with the disaster emergency;

Transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state departments and agencies or units of state departments and agencies for the purpose of performing or facilitating emergency management;

Subject to any applicable requirements for compensation under §12-75-124, commandeer or utilize any private property if he or she finds this necessary to cope with the disaster emergency;

Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area within the state if the Governor deems this action necessary for the preservation of life or other disaster mitigation, response, or recovery;

Prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with evacuation;

Control ingress and egress to and from a disaster area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises therein;

Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or transportation of alcoholic beverages, explosives, and combustibles; and

Make provision for the availability and use of temporary emergency housing.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 8; 1985, No. 629, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1941; Acts 1993, No. 1049, § 3; 1995, No. 116, § 2; 1999, No. 449, § 7; 1999, No. 646, §§ 20, 21; 2001, No. 1278, § 4; 2007, No. 1290, § 86; 2009, No. 165, §§ 38, 39; 2013, No. 547, § 1; 2019, No. 315, §§
967-969; 2019, No. 910, §
5882.

12-75-115. Disaster prevention generally.

At the Governor's direction, and pursuant to any other authority and competence state agencies have, including, but not limited to, those charged with responsibilities in flood plain management, stream encroachment and flow regulation, weather modification, fire prevention and control, air quality, public works, land use and land use planning, and construction standards shall make studies of disaster prevention-related matters.

Studies under subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall be furnished to the Governor and the Division of Emergency Management as soon as possible after completion and shall concentrate on means of reducing or avoiding damage caused by possible disasters or the consequences of possible disasters.

The Governor, from time to time, shall make recommendations to the General Assembly, local government, and other appropriate public and private entities as may facilitate measures for prevention or reduction of the harmful consequences of disasters.

If the Governor, upon review of the recommendation, finds after public hearing that the changes are essential, he or she shall so recommend to the agencies or local governments with jurisdiction over the area and subject matter.

If no action or insufficient action pursuant to the Governor's recommendations is taken within the time specified by the Governor, he or she shall so inform the General Assembly and request legislative action appropriate to mitigate the impact of disaster.

The new standard or control shall remain in effect until rejected by concurrent resolution of both houses of the General Assembly or amended by the Governor.

During the time it is in effect, the standard or control contained in the Governor's rule shall be administered and given full effect by all relevant regulatory agencies of the state and local governments to which it applies.

The Governor's action is subject to judicial review in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., but shall not be subject to temporary stay pending litigation.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 14; 1977, No. 408, § 5; 1981, No. 891, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1947; Acts 1999, No. 646, §§ 22, 23; 2007, No. 197, § 10; 2009, No. 165, § 40; 2019, No. 315, §§ 970, 971; 2019, No. 910, §§
5883, 5884.

12-75-116. State and local governmental entities — Liaison officers.

In furtherance of the policy described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the head of each state department, commission, agency, or institution with an emergency management role or responsibility shall appoint a member or members of his or her staff as agency emergency management liaison officer or officers to act on his or her behalf in ensuring the agency's capability to fulfill its role in emergency management activities and shall ensure that the Division of Emergency Management is notified of any change in the appointment.

Maintain close and continuous liaison with the division, as applicable;

Prepare agency annexes to the state and, as applicable, local emergency operations plans which are compatible with this chapter and with guidance provided by the division;

Report to the State Emergency Operations Center as required for any disaster training or exercises or emergency training or exercises;

Maintain files of agency resources to include personnel, facilities, and equipment available for disaster operation;

Ensure that the agency can respond promptly and cooperatively with other agencies in any disaster or major emergency situation under the overall management of the division;

Advise, assist, and evaluate the capabilities of counterpart local or federal government agencies in preparing for and carrying out disaster operations;

Designate personnel available for assignment to mobile support units and train such personnel in the tasks to be performed; and

Perform other related functions necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 7; 1985, No. 687, § 5; 1985, No. 978, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1940; Acts 1993, No. 1049, § 4; 1999, No. 646, § 24; 2007, No. 197, § 11; 2009, No. 165, §§ 41, 42; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5885-5888.

12-75-117. Interjurisdictional disaster planning and service areas.

If this action is taken with jurisdictions having enacted the Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, §12-76-101 et seq., any resulting agreement or agreements may be considered supplemental agreements pursuant to Article VI of that compact.

(A)If the other jurisdiction or jurisdictions with which the Governor proposes to cooperate pursuant to subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this section have not enacted that compact, then he or she may negotiate a special agreement with the jurisdiction or jurisdictions.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1944; Acts 1993, No. 1049, § 5; 1999, No. 646, § 25; 2007, No. 197, § 12; 2009, No. 165, § 43; 2019, No. 910, § 5889.

12-75-118. Local and interjurisdictional offices of emergency management and services.

A local office of emergency management or interjurisdictional office of emergency management shall be established as a public safety agency of its respective political subdivision or political subdivisions and shall be under the direction and control of the appropriate chief executive for the purposes of mitigation of, planning for, response to, and recovery from disaster and major emergency occurrences and for operation of public safety information networks.

Unless a municipality has been specifically designated as a local office of emergency management, it shall receive emergency management support from the county or counties where its corporate limits are situated.

The division shall publish and keep current a list of municipalities required to have local offices of emergency management or interjurisdictional offices of emergency management under this subsection.

The chief executive of a political subdivision shall notify the division of the manner in which the political subdivision is providing or securing disaster planning and emergency management, provide a staffing pattern for the local office of emergency management, identify the person who heads the local office of emergency management, and furnish additional information relating thereto as the division requires.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 10; 1977, No. 408, § 4; 1985, No. 687, § 7; 1985, No. 978, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1943; Acts 1993, No. 1049, § 6; 1999, No. 646, §§ 26-31; 2007, No. 197, § 13; 2009, No. 165, § 44; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5890-5894.

12-75-119. Statewide mutual aid system.

(A)An emergency jurisdiction may elect not to participate in the statewide mutual aid system.

Identify potential problems and hazards that could affect the emergency jurisdiction using an identification system common to all participating emergency jurisdictions;

Conduct joint planning, intelligence sharing, and threat assessment development with contiguous participating emergency jurisdictions;

(1)The chief executive officer of the governing body of a participating emergency jurisdiction or his or her designee may request assistance from another participating emergency jurisdiction:

There must be a local emergency declared under §12-75-108 or a plan to conduct training exercises;

A responding participating emergency jurisdiction may withhold its resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection and services for its own emergency jurisdiction;

(A)An emergency responder from a participating emergency jurisdiction responding to a request for assistance from another participating emergency jurisdiction shall remain under the command control of his or her home jurisdiction, including use of medical protocols, standard operating procedures, and other protocols and procedures identified by the division.

An emergency responder may receive additional state benefits as provided by law for death in the line of duty.

(A)For the purposes of liability, an emergency responder acting under the operational control of a participating emergency jurisdiction requesting assistance is deemed to be an employee of the participating emergency jurisdiction requesting assistance and exercising operational control.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 12; 1985, No. 687, § 8; 1985, No. 978, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1945; Acts 1993, No. 1049, § 7; 1999, No. 646, § 32; 2001, No. 1278, § 5; 2005, No. 1179, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5895-5898.

12-75-120. [Repealed.]

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1952; Acts 2007, No. 197, § 15.

12-75-122. Political activity prohibited.

An emergency management organization established under the authority of this chapter shall not:

Participate in any form of political activity; or

Be employed directly or indirectly for political purposes.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment redesignated the section, substituted “emergency management organization” for “organization for emergency services” in the introductory language, and made related and stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1953; Acts 2009, No. 165, § 45.

12-75-123. Appropriations and authority to accept services, gifts, grants, and loans.

Each political subdivision may make appropriations in the manner provided by law for making appropriations for the ordinary expenses of such political subdivision for the payment of expenses of its local office of emergency management.

If the federal government or any agency or officer of the federal government offers to the state, or through the state to any political subdivision, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan, for purposes of emergency management or disaster relief, the state, acting through the Governor, or the political subdivision, acting with the consent of the Governor and through its chief executive or governing body, may accept the offer.

Upon such acceptance, the Governor of the state or chief executive or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision and subject to the terms of the offer and the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer.

Whenever any person, firm, or corporation shall offer to the state, or to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan for purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting through its chief executive or governing body, may accept such offer.

Upon such acceptance, the Governor of the state, or chief executive or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state, or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state, or such political subdivision and subject to the terms of the offer.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “office of” for “organization for” in (a); substituted “emergency management” for “emergency services” in (b)(1); and made minor stylistic changes.

Compensation for services or for the taking or use of property shall be only to the extent that obligations recognized in this chapter are exceeded in a particular case and then only to the extent that the claimant may not be deemed to have volunteered his or her services or property without compensation.

Any person claiming compensation for the use, damage, loss, or destruction of property under this chapter shall file a claim therefor with the Arkansas State Claims Commission in the form and manner the commission provides.

Unless the amount of compensation on account of property damaged, lost, or destroyed is agreed between the claimant and the commission, the amount of compensation shall be calculated in the same manner as compensation due for a taking of property pursuant to the condemnation laws of this state.

Nothing in this section applies to or authorizes compensation for the destruction or damaging of standing timber or other property in order to provide a fire break or to the release of waters or the breach of impoundments in order to reduce pressure or other danger from actual or threatened flood.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment substituted “The state, any agency of the state, and any political subdivision shall not compensate any personal services” for “No personal services may be compensated by the state or any subdivision or agency thereof” in (b).

Advocates or has advocated a change by force or violence in the constitutional form of the United States Government or of this state or the overthrow of any government in the United States by force or violence; or

Has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of any subversive act against the United States or is under indictment or information charging any subversive act against the United States.

“I, ________, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Arkansas, and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of Public Safety Officer, upon which I am now about to enter.”

The chief executive of a local office of emergency management may determine what constitutes a uniform for his or her jurisdiction.

The uniform may include a badge or identification card, or both, of appropriate design and dimensions to identify local office of emergency management personnel as bona fide emergency management workers within their jurisdiction and division personnel as bona fide emergency workers for the state.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (b); substituted “the Division” for “an Arkansas Department” in (d)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” in (d)(1)(A), (d)(2), and (e).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning emergency servicers workers' eligibility, oath, and uniform, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 197, § 18. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 511, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1954; Acts 1989, No. 853, § 1; 1999, No. 646, § 34.

Any person issued or provided a badge, identification, or uniform described in subsection (d) of this section shall wear, carry, or display it at such times and places as shall be designated or required by the chief executive of the local jurisdiction for local office of emergency management personnel and by the director for division personnel.

All functions under this chapter and all other activities relating to emergency management are declared to be governmental functions.

No emergency responder, except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, when complying with or reasonably attempting to comply with this chapter, or any other rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this section or pursuant to any ordinance relating to blackout or other precautionary measures enacted by any political subdivision of the state, shall be liable for the death of or injury to persons, or for damage to property, as a result of any such activity.

The immunity in subsection (b) of this section shall extend to both emergency responders who are employees and to qualified emergency responders who are volunteers.

The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be entitled to under this chapter, under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq., or under the retirement system laws of Arkansas nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of the United States Congress.

(1)Any requirement for a license to practice any professional, mechanical, or other skill does not apply to any authorized emergency management worker who in the course of performing his or her duties as an emergency management worker practices the professional, mechanical, or other skill during an emergency.

However, a health practitioner license issued by another state is recognized in this state to the extent provided under this chapter, the Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, § 12-76-101 et seq., the Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act, § 12-87-101 et seq., and other laws of this state.

Any emergency responder performing emergency preparedness services at any place in this state pursuant to agreements, compacts, or arrangements for mutual aid and assistance, to which the state or a political subdivision of the state is a party, shall possess the same powers, duties, immunities, and privileges he or she would ordinarily possess if performing his or her duties in the state, province, or political subdivision of the state or province in which normally employed or rendering services.

An emergency responder is not required by this chapter to possess a license, certificate, permit, or other official recognition for his or her expertise in a particular field or area of knowledge.

However, to the extent that an emergency responder engages in a professional activity that by law requires a license, certificate, permit, or other official recognition in order to engage in the professional activity, the emergency responder shall possess the appropriate professional license, certificate, permit, or other official recognition.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 165 substituted “emergency management” for “emergency services” or variant in (a) and (e); substituted “an emergency management worker practices the” for “such, practice such” in (e); deleted (f); added (h); and made minor stylistic and punctuation changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 432 rewrote (e)(2).

The person is regularly employed by a local government or the state; and

The injury or death occurs while the person is:

Actually engaged in emergency management duties either during training or during a period of emergency; and

Subject to the order or control of or pursuant to a request of and under the supervision and instruction of the:

Governor;

Division of Emergency Management; or

Chief executive or the designated director of a department, county, or an accredited local government unit making use of emergency management volunteer workers.

The remedy provided in this section shall be the exclusive remedy as against the state and political subdivisions thereof.

(1)For the purpose of workers' compensation coverage in cases of injury to or death of an individual, all duly qualified emergency responders shall be deemed local government or state employees and shall receive compensation, and their survivors shall receive death benefits in like manner as regular local government or state employees for injury or death arising out of and in the course of their activities as emergency responders.

If the emergency responder was under the order or control of a state agency when injured or killed, compensation and benefits shall be charged against the experience rate of the state agency who exercised order or control at the time of injury or death and paid from the appropriate state workers' compensation fund.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(1) and the introductory paragraph of (f); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a); substituted “emergency responder” for “worker” in (d)(2); substituted “office of emergency management” for “emergency management office” in (f); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(1)(B)(ii)(b) ; and substituted “division” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in the introductory language of (f).

Although decedent was a registered emergency services worker for the county and was killed at scene of brushfire, he was not entitled to workers' compensation under this section because no disaster or catastrophe existed as defined by §12-75-103. Office of Emergency Servs. v. Home Ins. Co., 2 Ark. App. 185, 618 S.W.2d 573 (1981).

Cross References. Retirement of state employees, §24-4-101 et seq.

Payment will be controlled through personnel actions by the Director of the Division of Emergency Management.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(1) and (a)(3)(B).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(1) and (a)(3)(B).

The rate of pay for individuals who work less than a full pay period of eighty (80) hours or transfer to other work areas not defined in this section, or both, will not receive any enhanced rate of pay for that or subsequent pay periods.

A monthly report shall be made to the Legislative Council describing all payments made to employees under the provisions of this section.

There is created an advisory body to the Division of Emergency Management, to be known as the “Arkansas Homeland Security Advisory Group”.

The advisory group shall consist of representatives of federal, state, and local agencies and professional associations as determined by the Director of the Division of Emergency Management. The advisory group shall include, at a minimum, representatives of the following:

Arkansas Association of Fire Chiefs;

Arkansas Citizen Corps Point of Contact;

Division of Environmental Quality;

Department of Health;

Arkansas Emergency Management Association, Inc.;

Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas Department of Transportation;

Department of Agriculture;

Arkansas Municipal League;

National Guard;

61st Civil Support Team of the Arkansas National Guard;

Arkansas Sheriffs' Association;

Division of Arkansas State Police;

County Judges Association of Arkansas;

Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;

Division of Information Systems;

Federal Bureau of Investigation;

Health Resources and Services Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human Services;

United States Secret Service;

United States Attorney for the Eastern District of Arkansas; and

United States Attorney for the Western District of Arkansas.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in the introductory language of (d), deleted “By January 1, 2006” at the beginning, inserted “and maintain,” and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (b)(9).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a), in the introductory language of (b), in (b)(1), in (c), and in (f)(3); added “The” in (b)(2); substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(6); substituted “Department of Agriculture” for “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission” in (b)(10); substituted “Arkansas National Guard” for “National Guard” in (b)(13); substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (b)(15); deleted (b)(16) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (b)(18).

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 18; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1951; Acts 2007, No. 197, § 16; 2009, No. 165, §§ 46, 47.

12-75-124. Compensation for services and property.

(1)Each person within this state shall conduct himself or herself and keep and manage his or her affairs and property in ways that will reasonably assist and will not unreasonably detract from the ability of the state and the public to successfully meet disaster emergencies. This obligation includes appropriate personal service and use or restriction on the use of property in time of disaster emergency.

This chapter neither increases nor decreases these obligations but recognizes their existence under the Arkansas Constitution and statutes of this state and the common law.

The state, any agency of the state, and any political subdivision shall not compensate any personal services except pursuant to statute or local law or ordinance.

Compensation for property shall be only if the property was commandeered or otherwise used in coping with a disaster emergency and its use or destruction was ordered by the Governor or a member of the disaster emergency forces of this state.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1948; Acts 2009, No. 165, § 48.

12-75-125. Donation of property or equipment — Immunity.

Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily and with or without compensation grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of such real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons during an actual, impending, mock, or practice attack shall, together with his or her successors in interest, if any, not be civilly liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to, any person on or about such real estate or premises for loss of or damage to the property of such person.

The immunity in subsection (a) of this section shall extend to those persons who have voluntarily and with or without compensation granted the use of automotive vehicles, boats or similar equipment, or aircraft for use under the circumstances described in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1950.